Utah statutes.
23-21a-3.   State to condemn and purchase islands in Great Salt Lake -- Protection of American white pelican.

This act proposes to implement the policy set forth in Section 23-21a-2 by initiating the condemnation and purchase of the 163-acre Gunnison Island and the 22-acre Hat (Bird) Island in the Great Salt Lake situated in Box Elder County in the state of Utah, to be designated as wildlife management areas under jurisdiction of the Utah state Division of Wildlife Resources to be administered for the protection and perpetuation of the American white pelican.



Enacted by Chapter 103, 1977 General Session

